Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 8

Administrative Office of the Courts

16-3-801. Creation — Purpose.

There is created the administrative office of the courts. The purpose of this office is to assist in improving the administration of justice in the state by performing the duties and exercising the powers conferred in this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§ 16-3-801 — 16-3-805 (Acts 1963, ch. 86, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 214, § 1; T.C.A. §§ 16-325 — 16-329; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 24; 1992, ch. 651, § 1; 1992, ch. 896, § 1), concerning the executive secretary to the supreme court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Acts 1993, ch. 66, § 74 provided that it was the intention of the general assembly to change the name of the executive secretary to the supreme court to the administrative director of the courts. In furtherance of that intention, the Tennessee Code Commission was directed to make any other language or stylistic changes in the text of the law which might be necessary to effectuate the change.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Three Quarters of a Century in Judicial Administration (Delmar Karlen), 32 Tenn. L. Rev. 412.

16-3-802. Administrative director — Appointment — Salary.

The supreme court shall appoint the administrative director of the courts, who shall serve as the director of the administrative office of the courts. The administrative director shall serve at the pleasure of the supreme court.

The supreme court shall fix the salary of the administrative director of the courts at an amount not to exceed the salary paid to judges of the court of appeals.

Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§ 16-3-801 — 16-3-805 (Acts 1963, ch. 86, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 214, § 1; T.C.A. §§ 16-325 — 16-329; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 24; 1992, ch. 651, § 1; 1992, ch. 896, § 1), concerning the executive secretary to the supreme court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

16-3-803. Administrative director — Powers and duties.

The administrative director of the courts shall work under the supervision and direction of the chief justice and shall, as the chief administrative officer of the state court system, assist the chief justice in the administration of the state court system to the end that litigation may be expedited and the administration of justice improved.

The administrative director of the courts shall attend to duties that may be assigned by the supreme court or chief justice of the supreme court.

Acting in accordance with procedures established pursuant to § 9-6-103, the administrative director of the courts shall annually prepare, approve and submit a budget for the maintenance and operation of the state court system. When the budget for the maintenance and operation of the state court system is submitted to the department of finance and administration, the administrative director of the courts shall also submit copies of the budget to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives for referral and consideration by the appropriate standing committees of the general assembly.

The administrative director of the courts shall administer the accounts of the state court system, including all accounts related to the state court system as may be designated by the comptroller of the treasury and the chief justice. The administrative director of the courts shall draw and approve all requisitions for the payment of public moneys appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the state court system, and shall audit claims and prepare vouchers for presentation to the department of finance and administration, including payroll warrants, expense warrants and warrants covering the necessary cost of supplies, materials and other obligations by the various offices with respect to which the administrative director of the courts shall exercise fiscal responsibility.

The administrative director of the courts shall, within budgetary limitations, provide the judges of the trial courts of record with minimum law libraries, the nature and extent of which shall be determined in every instance by the administrative director on the basis of need. All books furnished shall remain the property of the state, and shall be returned to the custody of the administrative director by each judge upon the retirement or expiration of the official duties of the judge.

All functions performed by the administrative director of the courts that involve expenditures of state funds shall be subject to the same auditing procedures by the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury as required in connection with the expenditure of all other state funds.

The administrative director of the courts shall, within the limit of appropriated funds, prepare for the supreme court's approval an annual judicial education plan providing for the orientation and continuing training and education of all elected or appointed judges of trial and appellate courts of record of this state.

To the extent practicable, the annual judicial education plan shall provide that the orientation programs approved by the supreme court shall be made available to all newly elected or appointed judges of trial and appellate courts of record within one (1) year from the date of their initial appointment or election. The plan shall also provide, to the extent practicable, that all judges of trial and appellate courts of record whose terms exceed three (3) years shall, within two (2) years of the date of their initial election or appointment, be given the opportunity to attend judicial training programs approved by the supreme court.

For the purpose of implementing the annual judicial education plan, the administrative director of the courts, with the approval of the chief justice, may apply for and expend grant funds from whatever source.

The administrative director of the courts is authorized to recommend to the supreme court a plan whereby judges of trial and appellate courts of record who, on September 1, 1984, have not participated in training programs similar to those included in the annual judicial education plan, may be permitted to attend future orientation and training programs for judges made available through the annual plan.

Nothing in this subsection (f) nor in any annual judicial education plan prepared by the administrative director of the courts and approved by the supreme court shall be construed to require judges whose salaries and other related expenses are not paid by state government to participate in any training or orientation program provided for in this subsection (f). With the agreement of appropriate units of local government to pay for the reasonable costs of the orientation and training programs, the administrative director of the courts may authorize judges whose salaries are paid by units of local government to participate in orientation or training programs made available in accordance with the approved annual plan.

The administrative director of the courts shall continuously survey and study the operation of the state court system, the volume and condition of business in the courts of the state, whether of record or not, the procedures employed by those courts, and the quality and responsiveness of all of the courts with regard to the needs of civil litigants and the needs of the criminal justice system throughout the state.

The administrative director of the courts shall establish criteria, develop procedures and implement a Tennessee court information system (TnCIS). The system shall provide an integrated case management and accounting software system addressing the statutory responsibilities of the clerks of the general sessions, chancery, circuit and juvenile courts. The system shall also provide state-wide reporting and data transfer capabilities for the administrative office of the courts (AOC), department of human services, Tennessee bureau of investigation, department of safety and other state agencies determined by the AOC or as statutorily mandated. To ensure comparable data from all courts, the system shall be designed to report cases according to a standard definition of a case as set forth in § 16-1-117.

It is the duty of the administrative office of the courts to collect, develop and maintain uniform statistical information relative to court caseloads in Tennessee. For the purposes of monitoring the operation of the court system, reducing unnecessary delay and assessing the responsiveness of the court system to the needs of litigants, victims of crime and the citizens of the state, the administrative director of the courts shall have the responsibility for annually collecting, compiling, analyzing and publishing caseload statistics pertaining to the court system. It is the responsibility of the administrative director of the courts to develop, define, update and disseminate standard, uniform measures, definitions and criteria for collecting statistics pertaining to the court system. These standards and reporting requirements shall be used for uniform statistical data collection in all courts throughout the state, as established by statute or by the rules of the supreme court.

The administrative director of the courts shall prepare and distribute an annual report reflecting the operation of the courts of the state and highlighting those changes, innovations, or recommendations made or introduced to enhance the effectiveness of the courts.

The administrative director of the courts shall conduct ongoing internal review, analysis and planning for the future needs of the state court system. The analysis shall be designed to devise ways of simplifying court system procedure, expediting the transaction of court system business and correcting weaknesses in the administration of justice.

The administrative director of the courts shall:

File a copy of the supreme court's policies and guidelines governing the reimbursement of expenses for judicial officers with the judiciary committee of the house of representatives, the judiciary committee of the senate, and the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives, the fiscal review committee, the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration; and

Respond in a timely manner to any appropriate request by these committees or officials for information concerning reimbursements made pursuant to the policies and guidelines.

The administrative director of the courts shall annually prepare and distribute to the judiciary committee of the senate and judiciary committee of the house of representatives:

A report detailing the expenditure of moneys in the civil legal representation of indigents fund; and

A copy of any rules and policies adopted by the supreme court governing the expenditure and application of funds in the civil legal representation of indigents fund.

The administrative office of the courts shall collect, develop and maintain statistical information relative to sentencing in Tennessee. To assist the administrative office of the courts, the clerks of the circuit and criminal courts shall send a copy of each judgment document for a felony conviction to the administrative office of the courts. These copies shall be forwarded to the administrative office of the courts no less than one (1) time each month so that all judgments rendered in one (1) month have been received by the fifteenth day of the following month. When an electronic transfer system is operational and approved by the administrative office of the courts, the judgment document for all felony convictions shall be electronically transmitted to the administrative office of the courts in the same manner required by this subsection (n) for paper copies.

The administrative director of the courts shall administer finances related to the office's control and supervision of the existing state law libraries, including the:

Operation and maintenance of the libraries;

Preparation of warrants for the payment of obligations related to the operation and maintenance of the libraries; and

Recording of all transactions related to the administration of such finances in accordance with the laws and regulations governing state fiscal operations.

Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2; 1993, ch. 196, § 10; 1994, ch. 1005, § 1; 1995, ch. 550, § 3; 1999, ch. 486, § 1; 2001, ch. 408, §§ 1-3; 2002, ch. 791, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 45; 2016, ch. 619, § 4; 2019, ch. 345, § 21; 2019, ch. 420, §§ 9, 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§ 16-3-801 — 16-3-805 (Acts 1963, ch. 86, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 214, § 1; T.C.A. §§ 16-325 — 16-329; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 24; 1992, ch. 651, § 1; 1992, ch. 896, § 1), concerning the executive secretary to the supreme court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives, the judiciary committee of the senate, and” for “the judiciary committees and” in (l )(1); and substituted “the judiciary committee of the senate and civil justice committee of the house of representatives” for “the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives” at the end of the introductory paragraph in (m).

The 2016 amendment added (o).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” preceding “committee of the house” in (l )(1) and (m).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 420, rewrote (b) which read: “The administrative director of the courts shall serve as secretary to the judicial council, shall perform those duties enumerated in § 16-3-502, and shall attend to other duties that may be assigned by the supreme court or chief justice of the supreme court. As secretary to the judicial council, the administrative director of the courts shall provide staff and secretarial support for all functions of the judicial council”; and rewrote (g) which read: “The administrative director of the courts shall continuously survey and study the operation of the state court system, the volume and condition of business in the courts of the state, whether of record or not, the procedures employed by those courts, and the quality and responsiveness of all of the courts with regard to the needs of civil litigants and the needs of the criminal justice system throughout the state. The administrative director of the courts shall also provide liaison and staff support to the judicial council with regard to the responsibilities of the judicial council in the areas described in this subsection (g).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 619, § 6. March 22, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

Cross-References. Administration of annual educational seminar of Tennessee state court clerks' conference, § 18-1-506.

Orientation and continuing training and education of trial and appellate judges, § 16-3-502.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § II.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee supreme court has the authority to require general sessions courts to collect and report statistical and other data to the administrative office of the courts concerning filing and disposition of driving while intoxicated cases and to make such information available to the department of safety or to any other department or agency of state government, OAG 01-054 (4/9/01).

Cited: Cornelius v. McWilliams, 641 S.W.2d 508, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 494 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982); Blackard v. Memphis Area Med. Ctr. for Women, Inc., 262 F.3d 568, 2001 FED App. 286P, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 19024 (6th Cir. Tenn. 2001).

16-3-804. Personnel — Law practice barred.

The administrative director of the courts shall, subject to the approval of the supreme court, appoint and fix the compensation of assistants, clerical staff, or other employees that are necessary to enable the administrative director to perform the duties of the administrative office of the courts.

Neither the administrative director of the courts nor any employee of the state court system shall, during the term of office or employment, directly or indirectly engage in the practice of law in any of the courts of this state. Nothing in this subsection (b) or any other law shall be construed to prohibit personnel described in this section from providing pro bono legal services through an organized program of pro bono legal services that receives funding pursuant to § 16-3-808 and that provides professional liability insurance for losses sustained by clients of lawyers participating in the program.

Prior to a person's employment with the administrative office of the courts, the administrative director of the courts is authorized to obtain a criminal history background check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Background checks must include fingerprint checks against state and federal criminal records maintained by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation.

The administrative director of the courts may establish the job titles or classifications to which the requirements of this subsection (c) apply. Nothing in this subsection (c) supersedes any mandatory fingerprint-based criminal history background requirements that may be applicable for any person who is seeking employment in a position subject to licensure, approval, or certification by any state program or agency.

The administrative office of the courts shall pay the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, as appropriate, for any costs the bureaus incur when conducting the investigations of applicants.

Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2; 2009, ch. 7, § 3; 2017, ch. 104, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§ 16-3-801 — 16-3-805 (Acts 1963, ch. 86, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 214, § 1; T.C.A. §§ 16-325 — 16-329; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 24; 1992, ch. 651, § 1; 1992, ch. 896, § 1) concerning the executive secretary to the supreme court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the last sentence of (b).

The 2017 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 7, § 4. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, ch. 104, § 2. April 7, 2017.

16-3-805. Office, equipment, and supplies.

The administrative director of the courts shall be provided with suitable office space and with all office equipment and supplies necessary to perform the duties and functions of the office.

Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§ 16-3-801 — 16-3-805 (Acts 1963, ch. 86, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 214, § 1; T.C.A. §§ 16-325 — 16-329; Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 24; 1992, ch. 651, § 1; 1992, ch. 896, § 1) concerning the executive secretary to the supreme court, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 65, § 2.

16-3-806. Appropriation of funds for special personnel assigned to capital sentence costs.

All funds appropriated solely to employ, contract with or reassign personnel for the purpose of providing prompt and fair adjudication of post-conviction proceedings in capital sentence cases shall be appropriated to the administrative director of the courts to be allocated to, and pursuant to standards established by agreement of, the chief justice, the attorney general and reporter, the executive director of the conference of district attorneys general and the executive director of the conference of district public defenders. In addition, funds may be allocated and grants given to the offices of public defenders in Shelby and Davidson counties. Notice of intended allocations shall be given to the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1993, ch. 472, § 5; 1996, ch. 610, § 4; 1996, ch. 996, § 2.

Cross-References. Attorney general and reporter, hiring of special personnel, § 8-6-111.

District attorney general, hiring of special personnel, § 8-7-111.

District public defender, hiring of special personnel, § 8-14-111.

Supreme court, hiring of special personnel, § 16-3-212.

16-3-807. Tennessee judicial information system fund.

The state treasurer is authorized and directed to establish within the general fund the Tennessee judicial information system fund, as a restricted revolving account in the state treasury.

The source of funding for this account shall be judicial branch appropriations made in the general appropriations act and unexpended funds carried forward in accordance with subsection (d).

The funds for the Tennessee judicial information system established by this section may be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to policy guidelines, established by resolution of the funding board, created by § 9-9-101. The funding board shall establish the policy guidelines for the investment of the Tennessee judicial information system fund in a manner that is lawful for investment of state funds. All interest or other earnings shall be added to the corpus of the fund and shall remain a part of the fund.

Any unencumbered or unexpended balance of this account at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this section.

The balance of the fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, personnel, services and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation and administration of information services, telecommunications, systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on items paid in installments.

Acts 1994, ch. 1005, § 5.

16-3-808. Funds for civil legal representation of indigents.

The state treasurer is authorized and directed to establish within the general fund a fund known as the civil legal representation of indigents fund.

The source of funding for this fund shall be the revenue derived from the litigation tax levied pursuant to § 67-4-602(g). The revenue shall be collected in accordance with § 67-4-603, deposited to the civil legal representation of indigents fund as provided by law, and invested for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603. Moneys in the fund shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall remain available and are appropriated exclusively for providing legal representation of poor persons in civil matters.

Moneys in the civil legal representation of indigents fund shall be annually allocated and expended to provide legal representation to poor persons in the state in civil matters in the manner determined by the supreme court, including in accordance with any rules and policies adopted by the supreme court for such purpose; provided, that no moneys allocated from this fund shall be expended for class-action lawsuits. The supreme court may designate not-for-profit organizations that ordinarily render or finance legal services to poor persons in civil matters to receive or administer the distribution of allocated funds. The supreme court shall make a conscious effort in the allocation of funds and in the adoption of any implementing rules and policies to cause the moneys in the civil legal representation of indigents fund to be expended for the benefit of indigent clients in all ninety-five (95) counties of the state on a poverty population basis.

The administrative office of the courts shall appoint a five-member advisory panel to facilitate communication and joint activities among grantees of the civil legal representation of indigents fund. The administrative office of the courts shall appoint panel members as follows:

One (1) member shall be appointed from lists of nominees submitted by bar associations whose membership primarily consists of minority attorneys;

One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the Tennessee Bar Association;

One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the Tennessee Trial Lawyers Association;

One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the Tennessee conference on social welfare; and

One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the state court clerks conference.

Acts 1995, ch. 550, § 2; 1999, ch. 502, § 3.

Cross-References. Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation, § 16-3-821.

16-3-809. State law libraries — Control and supervision — Powers — Expenditures.

The administrative office of the courts shall have control and supervision of the existing state law libraries at Nashville, Knoxville, and Jackson. The office's powers include, but are not limited to, the following:

The power to employ necessary personnel, either full or part time, and to fix their compensation;

The power to purchase or otherwise acquire books, furniture, supplies, and all other necessary equipment, including the power to dispose of by sale, exchange, gift or otherwise, books and equipment, whenever in the judgment of the office it is deemed advisable;

The power to make and enforce all necessary rules for the management and operation of the libraries; and

The power to exchange the Tennessee Reports, the Tennessee Appeals Reports, Acts, and codes for the reports, acts, and codes of other jurisdictions, and the Tennessee Reports, the Tennessee Appeals Reports, Acts, and codes available for exchange under present and future laws shall be at the disposal of the office for such purpose.

All expenditures made by the office pursuant to this section shall be within the limits of the amounts appropriated by the general assembly; provided, that the office has the authority to allocate amounts necessary for the operation and maintenance of each library among the libraries as it deems to be in the best interest of each library, but within the limits of the entire appropriation.

Acts 2016, ch. 619, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-3-809 (Acts 1998, ch. 686, § 1; 2012, ch. 578, § 2; terminated by Acts 2014, ch. 499, § 2, effective February 28, 2014) concerned the judicial information system advisory committee.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 619, § 6. March 22, 2016.

16-3-810. Dismissal of defendant upon completion of diversion program—Creation of form.

The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the Tennessee court clerks association, shall devise a standard form, or revise the existing uniform judgment document promulgated pursuant to Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 17, for use by judges when ordering the dismissal of charges against a defendant following the successful completion of a diversion program under title 40, chapter 15 or § 40-35-313, or the expunction of a defendant's public records following the dismissal of charges against the defendant. The suggested order shall include a place for all information the courts are required to send to the Tennessee bureau of investigation pursuant to §§ 40-15-105(e), 40-32-101(d) and 40-35-313(c) for entry into the bureau's expunged criminal offender and pretrial diversion database. Upon completion of the design of the form or revised uniform judgment document, the administrative office of the courts shall recommend to the supreme court that it promulgate a rule requiring the use of the form or revised uniform judgment document for the purposes provided in this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 1099, § 12.

16-3-811. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 486, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 32; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 501, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-3-811 concerned the Tennessee court information system steering committee.

Acts 2014, ch. 501, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee court information system steering committee, created by § 16-3-811, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

16-3-812. Providing information regarding case disposition, compliance with reporting information and reports made by AOC regarding auditing compliance and accuracy of required reports.

The administrative office of the courts (AOC) shall be responsible for making available to the Tennessee bureau of investigation in a mutually agreeable form all information the AOC receives from the various courts regarding disposition of cases.

The AOC shall be responsible for making available, upon request, to the Tennessee bureau of investigation in a mutually agreeable form all information the AOC receives from the various courts regarding compliance with the reporting requirements of §§ 16-10-213, 16-11-206, 16-15-303, 16-16-120 and reports made by the AOC pursuant to § 16-1-117(a)(6)(B) for purposes of auditing compliance and accuracy of the required reports.

Acts 1999, ch. 495, § 1; 2013, ch. 300, § 2.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 11. July 1, 2013.

16-3-813. Credentialed court interpreter.

Any person seeking to become a credentialed court interpreter for spoken foreign languages pursuant to any rules that may be promulgated by the supreme court shall be required to supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history records check conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation pursuant to § 38-6-109, the federal bureau of investigation, other law enforcement agency or any other legally authorized entity. In addition to the fee required by § 38-6-109, the sheriff or any other law enforcement agency may assess a fee of up to ten dollars ($10.00) for costs incurred in complying with this section. Any fees assessed in the criminal background records check process are the responsibility of the person seeking to be credentialed as a court interpreter of spoken foreign languages.

The administrative office of the courts (AOC) shall create and maintain a registry of those persons credentialed as court interpreters of spoken foreign languages and shall post the registry on the web site maintained by the AOC.

Acts 2002, ch. 494, § 1; 2004, ch. 755, § 1.

16-3-814. Integrated Criminal Justice Act of 2006.

Sections 16-3-814 — 16-3-820 shall be known and may be cited as the “Integrated Criminal Justice Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-815. Creation of the integrated criminal justice steering committee — Purpose.

There is created an integrated criminal justice steering committee, which shall be administratively attached to the administrative office of the courts. The purpose of the integrated criminal justice steering committee is to provide the governmental and technical information systems infrastructure necessary for accomplishing state and local government public safety and justice functions in the most effective manner, by appropriately and efficiently sharing criminal justice and juvenile justice information among law enforcement agencies, judicial agencies, corrections agencies, executive agencies and political subdivisions.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1; 2013, ch. 97, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The integrated criminal justice steering committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-247.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted “of the state” from the end of the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 97, § 2. April 8, 2013.

16-3-816. Duties of the committee.

It is the duty of the integrated criminal justice steering committee to facilitate the development of cost-effective, integrated justice information systems that maximize standardization of information and communications technology across the state's justice and justice-affiliated agencies. It is further the duty of the committee to provide the leadership, strategy, mission, vision, goals, decision-making structure and accountability processes for the integrated criminal justice system.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-817. Goals of the integrated criminal justice system.

Any integrated criminal justice system developed through the facilitation of the committee shall:

Increase public safety and improve national security;

Minimize the threat and risk of injury to specific individuals;

Minimize the threat and risk of injury to law enforcement and other first responder personnel;

Minimize the threat and risk of damage to real or personal property;

Protect individual civil rights, civil liberties, privacy rights and other protected interests;

Protect the integrity of the criminal investigatory, criminal intelligence and justice system processes and information;

Minimize reluctance of individuals or groups to use or cooperate with the justice system;

Support the role of the justice system in society;

Promote governmental legitimacy and accountability;

Not unduly burden the ongoing business of the justice system; and

Make the most effective use of public resources allocated to justice agencies.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-818. Membership of steering committee — Advisory committee appointments — Policies and procedures.

The membership of the steering committee shall consist of:

Director of the office of criminal justice programs or a designee;

President of the Tennessee sheriffs association or a designee;

President of the Tennessee association of chiefs of police or a designee;

Executive director of the Tennessee district attorneys general conference or a designee;

Executive director of the Tennessee district public defenders conference or a designee;

Commissioner of correction or a designee;

Chair of the board of parole or a designee;

President of the Tennessee court clerks association or a designee;

One (1) member of each body of the general assembly to be appointed by the respective speakers of the house of representatives and the senate;

Attorney general and reporter or a designee;

Tennessee chief information officer or a designee;

Director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation or a designee;

Commissioner of safety or a designee;

Director of the Tennessee office of homeland security or a designee;

Director of the administrative office of the courts or a designee;

Chief justice of the Tennessee supreme court or a designee;

Deputy commissioner of the juvenile justice division of the department of children’s services or a designee;

Director of the Tennessee emergency management agency or a designee; and

Director of the governor’s highway safety office or a designee.

The steering committee may appoint advisory council members from time to time. Advisory members may represent entities, including, but not limited to:

Municipal judges conference;

Tennessee bar association;

Tennessee county services association;

Governor’s office and lay members appointed by the governor;

Commission on children and youth;

Council of juvenile and family court judges;

Tennessee emergency communications division;

Department of revenue;

Department of commerce and insurance;

Tennessee fireman’s association; and

Alcoholic beverage commission.

The steering committee may establish policies and procedures relative to membership and operations of the steering committee on issues, including, but not limited to, election and terms of officers, voting privileges, establishment of subcommittees, cessation of membership on the steering committee and other operational issues as may be necessary to the efficient and effective operation of the steering committee.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-819. Compensation.

The members of the steering committee, advisory council and subcommittees shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-820. Hiring of personnel to manage integrated criminal justice projects.

The administrative office of the courts (AOC) shall be empowered to hire personnel to manage integrated criminal justice projects and to be responsible for day-to-day operations. In making the personnel decisions, the director of the AOC shall consult with the steering committee.

Acts 2006, ch. 917, § 1.

16-3-821. Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation.”

There is established in the state treasury a separate account known as the Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation. It is the intent of the general assembly that this fund be used to provide supplemental funding for the provision of civil legal representation for indigents. Distribution of the fund as provided in this section shall be administered by the administrative office of the courts (AOC).

Contributions to the Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation are voluntary and this section shall not be construed to require an appropriation from the general fund to establish, maintain, operate, or disburse money from the fund, if done in accordance with this section.

The Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation is authorized to receive contributions from the following sources:

The unpaid residuals from settlements or awards in class action litigation in both state and federal courts; provided, that the litigation has been certified as a class action under Tenn. R. Civ. P. 23 or Rule 23 of the federal rules of civil procedure;

Awards from other actions in a state or federal court, when specifically designated by the judges in those actions;

Monetary settlements, whether through mediation, arbitration or otherwise, when so designated by a party authorized to do so;

Gifts, contributions, bequests, donations, devises and grants from any legal and appropriate source to effectuate the purpose of the fund. If these contributions to the fund are not in the form of money or other negotiable instrument, any income, rents or proceeds generated from the items contributed shall be deposited into the fund; and

Any other legitimate funding source that is now available or may in the future become available.

Amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain available for use as provided in this section. Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the fund.

Any cost associated with the Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation shall be paid for by the proceeds of this fund.

When the corpus of the Tennessee voluntary fund for indigent civil representation reaches or exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), the interest on the corpus shall be distributed in accordance with § 67-4-806(2).

The AOC and the Tennessee Alliance for Legal Services may make the judiciary and legal profession aware of and promote the existence and purpose of this fund.

The Tennessee Alliance for Legal Services may also make any materials explaining and promoting the fund available to charitable or philanthropic foundations and other groups or persons who might be interested in contributing to the fund.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or affect the operation of the civil legal representation of indigents fund created in § 16-3-808. It is the intent of the general assembly that the two (2) funds remain distinct and separate methods to achieve the same goal of providing quality legal representation to indigents in civil actions.

Acts 2006, ch. 589, § 1.